dev/numerals/numerals.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<num%>
%<percent%>
%<subst%>


%<px1sg%>             ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>             ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>             ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>             ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>             ! Second person plural
%<px%>                ! General possessive     !# -нікі

%<nom%>               ! Nominative
%<gen%>               ! Genitive
%<dat%>               ! Dative 
%<acc%>               ! Accusative 
%<abl%>               ! Ablative 
%<loc%>               ! Locative 
%<ins%>               ! Instrumental 


%<px1sg%>             ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>             ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>             ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>             ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>             ! Second person plural
%<px%>                ! General possessive     !# -нікі

%<nom%>               ! Nominative
%<gen%>               ! Genitive
%<dat%>               ! Dative 
%<acc%>               ! Accusative 
%<abl%>               ! Ablative 
%<loc%>               ! Locative 
%<ins%>               ! Instrumental 


%<px1sg%>             ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>             ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>             ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>             ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>             ! Second person plural
%<px%>                ! General possessive     !# -нікі

%<nom%>               ! Nominative
%<gen%>               ! Genitive
%<dat%>               ! Dative 
%<acc%>               ! Accusative 
%<abl%>               ! Ablative 
%<loc%>               ! Locative 
%<ins%>               ! Instrumental 


%<px1sg%>             ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>             ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>             ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>             ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>             ! Second person plural
%<px%>                ! General possessive     !# -нікі

%<nom%>               ! Nominative
%<gen%>               ! Genitive
%<dat%>               ! Dative 
%<acc%>               ! Accusative 
%<abl%>               ! Ablative 
%<loc%>               ! Locative 
%<ins%>               ! Instrumental 


%<px1sg%>             ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>             ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>             ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>             ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>             ! Second person plural
%<px%>                ! General possessive     !# -нікі

%<nom%>               ! Nominative
%<gen%>               ! Genitive
%<dat%>               ! Dative 
%<acc%>               ! Accusative 
%<abl%>               ! Ablative 
%<loc%>               ! Locative 
%<ins%>               ! Instrumental 


%<px1sg%>             ! First person singular
%<px2sg%>             ! Second person singular
%<px3sp%>             ! Third person singular/plural
%<px1pl%>             ! First person plural
%<px2pl%>             ! Second person plural
%<px%>                ! General possessive     !# -нікі

%<nom%>               ! Nominative
%<gen%>               ! Genitive
%<dat%>               ! Dative 
%<acc%>               ! Accusative 
%<abl%>               ! Ablative 
%<loc%>               ! Locative 
%<ins%>               ! Instrumental 

%{D%}
%{A%}
%{I%}
%{S%}
%{N%}
%{G%}
%{n%}

%{а%} 
%{э%} 

%{й%}
%{л%}
%{н%}
%{з%}
%{т%}
%{с%}

%-
%,
%.
%%

LEXICON Root

Numerals ; 
LASTDIGIT ;
! LASTDIGIT-10 ; ! 18 = 8

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!
!!  C O P I E D    F R O M    K A Z . L E X C 
!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CLIT-IMP2P               

%+шы%<mod_foc%>:%>ш%{I%} # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-MA

%+ма%<qst%>:%>% %{M%}%{A%} # ;

LEXICON CLIT-OTHER

%+мекен%<qst%>:% %{M%}екен # ;
%+ғой%<mod_ass%>:% %{G%}ой # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT

CLIT-OTHER ;
CLIT-MA ;
# ;


LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON SUBST-NONOM

N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: # ; 
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLIT ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н # ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} # ;
%<ins%>:%>%{M%}ен CLIT ;

LEXICON CASE-NONOM

!%<nom%>: # ; ! commented out for numerals
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLIT ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н # ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} # ;
%<ins%>:%>%{M%}ен CLIT ;

LEXICON ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: CLIT ;
%<subst%>: CASE ;

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC      

%<px%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CASE ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR/SUBST ; 
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLIT ;                

LEXICON CASE-ETC

CASE ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON CASE-ETC-NONOM

CASE-NONOM ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON POSS-REAL  ! P_2

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON POSSESSION
POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSSESSION ;
CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM

POSSESSION ;
CASE-ETC-NONOM ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!
!!
!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON SQRD 

²%<num%>:2 # ;  ! Dir/LR
³%<num%>:3 # ;  ! Dir/LR
²%<num%>:² # ; 
³%<num%>:³ # ; 
%<num%>: # ; 

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>:%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>:%-ш%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-ш%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-ш%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-ш%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<percent%>:%% # ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%% # ;

%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%% SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{з%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{з%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{с%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

°С%<num%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{а%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{э%}%{с%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

км:км SQRD ;
мм:мм SQRD ;
см:см SQRD ;
м:м SQRD ;

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1%{э%}%{й%} NUM ; ! "бір"
2:2%{э%} NUM ; ! "екі"
3:3%{э%}%{с%} NUM ; ! "үш"
4:4%{э%}%{с%} NUM ; ! "төрт"
5:5%{э%}%{с%} NUM ; ! "бес"
6:6%{а%} NUM ; ! "алты"
7:7%{э%} NUM ; ! "жеті"
8:8%{э%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "сегіз"
9:9%{а%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "тоғыз"

! LEXICON LASTDIGIT-10
! 
! 11:11%{э%}%{й%} NUM ; ! "он бір"
! 12:12%{э%} NUM ; ! "он екі"
! 13:13%{э%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "он үш"
! 14:14%{э%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "он төрт"
! 15:15%{э%}%{т%} NUM ; ! "он бес"
! 16:16%{а%} NUM ; ! "он алты"
! 17:17%{э%} NUM ; ! "он жеті"
! 18:18%{э%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "он сегіз"
! 19:19%{а%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "он тоғыз"

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "он"
2%0:2%0%{а%} NUM ; ! "қырық"
3%0:3%0%{а%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "отыз"
4%0:4%0%{а%}%{с%} NUM ; ! "қырық"
5%0:5%0%{э%}%{й%} NUM ; ! "елу"
6%0:6%0%{а%}%{с%} NUM ; ! "алпыс"
7%0:7%0%{э%}%{с%} NUM ; ! "жетпіс"
8%0:8%0%{э%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "сексен"
9%0:9%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "тоқсан"

LEXICON POWERS 
!%0:%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "он"
%0%0:%0%0%{э%}%{з%} NUM ; ! "жүз"
%0%0%0:%0%0%0%{а%}%{н%} NUM ; ! "мың"

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ; 
%.:%. DIGITLEX ; 
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ; 
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ; 
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ; 
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ; 
%,:%, POWERS ; 
%.:%. POWERS ; 
      DIGITLEX ; 
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ; 
! <[%0 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> LASTDIGIT ; ! to avoid 212, 318 here

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ; 
1:1 LOOP ;
2:2 LOOP ;
3:3 LOOP ;
4:4 LOOP ;
5:5 LOOP ;
6:6 LOOP ;
7:7 LOOP ;
8:8 LOOP ;
9:9 LOOP ;

LEXICON Numerals

%0:%0 NUM ; 
№:№ DIGITLEX ; 
DIGITLEX ; 
LASTDIGIT ;
LASTDIGIT-REST ;
